Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.090

Ballot title and summary—Mailed to proponents and other persons—Appearance on petitions.

When the ballot title and summary are finally established, the secretary of state shall file the instrument establishing it with the proposed measure and transmit a copy thereof by mail to the person proposing the measure, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, the secretary of the senate, and to any other individuals who have made written request for such notification. Thereafter such ballot title shall be the title of the measure in all petitions, ballots, and other proceedings in relation thereto. The summary shall appear on all petitions directly following the ballot title.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1810. Prior: 2000 c 197 s 5; 1982 c 116 s 7; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.070; prior: 1913 c 138 s 4, part; RRS s 5400, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.070.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2000 c 197: See note following RCW 29A.72.050.